Utah statutes.
20A-13-101.5.   Representatives to the United States Congress -- Four representative districts -- When elected -- District boundaries.

(1) (a)  The state of Utah is divided into four districts for the election of representatives to the Congress of the United States, with one member to be elected from each Congressional district.

(b)  At the general election to be held in 2012, and biennially thereafter, one representative from each Congressional district shall be elected to serve in the Congress of the United States.

(2)  The Legislature adopts the official census population figures and maps of the Bureau of the Census of the United States Department of Commerce developed in connection with the taking of the 2010 national decennial census as the official data for establishing Congressional district boundaries.

(3) (a)  Notwithstanding Subsection (2), the Legislature enacts the district numbers and boundaries of the Congressional districts designated in the Congressional shapefile that is the electronic component of the bill that enacts this section.

(b)  That Congressional shapefile, and Congressional boundaries generated from that Congressional shapefile, may be accessed via the Utah Legislature's website.



Amended by Chapter 383, 2013 General Session

